Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 610 Procedural Matters
610.120.
Review, continuation, or termination of disposition orders.

Except as otherwise provided by KRS Chapters 605 and 635, an order of commitment or an order of supervision or probation made by the court in the case of a child may be terminated at any time prior to expiration on the court’s own initiative or on motion by:

A child who is affected by an order of juvenile session of District Court;

The family, custodian, guardian, or legal representative of such a child;

The Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet;

The county attorney of the county in which the committing court presides; or

Any other person having an interest in the welfare of the child.

Grounds for such action may include but are not limited to allegations that there has been a substantial change of material circumstances, there exists new evidence affecting the disposition of the child, the child is no longer in need of commitment, probation, or placement, the child has not responded to or benefited from treatment or the child has not received adequate and proper treatment, the original proceedings were not conducted in the manner required by law or the public interest requires termination of the order. Upon review of the child’s case, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the cabinet, any agency, facility, or individual responsible for the supervision, care, or treatment of the child shall divulge and communicate such information regarding the child as the court may require.

Except as otherwise provided by KRS Chapter 640 relating to youthful offenders, and KRS

610.110

,

620.140

,

635.060

,

635.090

,

635.515

, or

645.140

, relating to extending commitment beyond the age of eighteen (18), an order of commitment, temporary custody, or an order of supervision or probation made by the court in the case of a child shall be terminated when the child attains the age of eighteen (18) unless otherwise provided in law. At least fourteen (14) days prior to the termination of an order of commitment, the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall prepare a summary of the information concerning the child and submit it with written notification to the committing court that a child’s commitment is due to expire.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 31, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 23, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 398, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 538, § 8, effective April 13, 1998; 2002, ch. 257, § 13, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 132, § 39, effective July 1, 2015.

610.125.
Permanency hearing after custody given to Department of Juvenile Justice or cabinet.

If a child has been removed from the home and placed in the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, a judge of the District Court shall conduct a permanency hearing no later than twelve (12) months after the date the child is considered to have entered foster care, and every twelve (12) months thereafter if custody and out-of-home placement continues, to determine the future status of the child. For purposes of this section, a child shall be considered to have entered foster care on the earlier of the date of the first judicial finding that the child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect or the date that is sixty (60) days after the date on which the child is removed from the home.

The court shall address the following areas:

If parental rights have not been terminated, whether the child should be returned to the parent;

Whether the child should be placed for adoption;

Whether the child should be placed with a permanent custodian; and

Whether the cabinet has documented a compelling reason that it is in the best interest of the child who is age sixteen (16) or older to be placed in another planned permanent living arrangement other than those listed in this subsection. Prior to the approval of this permanency goal, the court shall:

Ask the child about the desired permanency outcome; and

Make a judicial determination explaining why, as of the date of the hearing, another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency goal for the child and provide compelling reasons why it continues to not be in the best interest of the child to return home, be placed for adoption, be placed with a legal guardian, or be placed with a fit and willing relative or fictive kin.

If the cabinet or the Department of Juvenile Justice determines that reasonable efforts to reunify the child with the child’s parent will not be made, the cabinet or Department of Juvenile Justice shall file a case permanency plan as defined by KRS

620.230

or case progress report with the court that documents the reasons for not making reasonable efforts. The court shall hold a permanency hearing within thirty (30) days of the filing of the cabinet’s or Department of Juvenile Justice’s plan or report with the Court.

The Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall inform the court not less than sixty (60) days prior to the expiration of the time in which the hearing shall be held and within the time established in subsection (1) of this section, and shall further inform the court of the name and address of the child’s foster parents, preadoptive parents, fictive kin, or relatives providing care to the child; court-appointed special advocate; and foster care review board member assigned to the case. For the hearing to be held pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the names and addresses of the persons identified in this subsection shall be provided in the case permanency plan or case progress report to be filed with the court. The court shall set a time for the hearing and notify the child’s parent, foster parents, preadoptive parents, fictive kin, or relatives providing care to the child and who also shall have a right to be heard; court-appointed special advocate; foster care review board member assigned to the case; attorney for the child; attorney for the parent, if any; and the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet.

The Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet shall present evidence to the court concerning the care and progress of the child since the last permanency hearing, including the following:

The length of time the child has been committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet;

The number, location, and date for each placement during the total period of the child’s commitment;

A description of the services and assistance provided to the parent or arranged by the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet since the last case permanency plan or case progress report, and the results achieved;

A description of the efforts and progress of the child’s parent since the last case permanency plan and case progress report, including the number and dates of parental visits and the extent, quality, and frequency of the parent’s communication with the child;

The familial and institutional barriers to:

Returning the child to the home;

Ending the commitment of the child to the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet; and

Delivery of appropriate services needed by the child;

Recommendations of services needed to make the transition from out-of-home care to independent living for children who have reached the age of fourteen (14) years;

An evaluation of the child’s current placement and services provided to the child;

Recommendations for necessary services required to terminate the commitment of the child to the cabinet, to return the child home, or to facilitate another permanent placement;

Recommendations as to the permanency goal for the child; and

For a child with another planned permanency arrangement as the child’s permanency goal:

The intensive, ongoing efforts to return the child to the home or secure a placement with a fit and willing relative, legal guardian, fictive kin, or adoptive parent, including efforts that utilize search technology to find the biological family;

The steps the agency is taking to ensure that the child’s foster family home or licensed child-caring facility is following the reasonable and prudent parent standard in accordance with 42

U.S.C. sec. 671

; and

The cabinet’s efforts to ensure the child has regular, ongoing opportunities to engage in age or developmentally appropriate activities, including consulting with the child in an age and developmentally appropriate manner about the opportunities of the child to participate in the activities.

The child’s parent, foster parent, preadoptive parent, fictive kin, or relative providing care to the child shall have the right to be heard; and

The attorney for the parent, attorney for the child, or court-appointed special advocate, if deemed appropriate by the court, may present any evidence relevant to the determination of a permanency goal for the child.

Upon conclusion of the hearing the court shall make a written order determining the permanency plan for the child.

If necessary, the case may be redocketed for further review of the progress toward the implementation of the permanency plan established at the permanency hearing.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 318, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 489, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 358, § 26, effective July 1, 1997; 1998, ch. 57, § 8, effective March 17, 1998; 1998, ch. 398, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 60, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 79, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 115, § 5, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 10, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

610.127.
Parental circumstances negating requirement for reasonable efforts to reunify child with family.

Reasonable efforts as defined in KRS

620.020

shall not be required to be made with respect to a parent of a child if a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the parent has:

Subjected the child to aggravated circumstances as defined in KRS

600.020

;

Been convicted in a criminal proceeding of having caused or contributed to the death of another child of the parent;

Committed a felony assault that resulted in serious bodily injury to the child or to another child of the parent;

Had their parental rights to another child terminated involuntarily;

Engaged in a pattern of conduct due to a substance use disorder as defined in KRS

222.005

for a period of not less than ninety (90) days that has rendered the parent incapable of caring for the immediate and ongoing needs of the child, and the parent has refused or failed to complete available treatment for alcohol or other drug abuse;

Mental illness as defined in KRS

202A.011

or is an individual with an intellectual disability as defined in KRS

202B.010

or other developmental disability as defined in KRS

387.510

that places the child at substantial risk of physical or emotional injury even if the most appropriate and available services were provided to the parent for twelve (12) months;

Sexually abused the child or is required to register on a sex offender registry under 42

U.S.C. sec. 16913

, the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. No. 109-248; or

Other circumstances in existence that make continuation or implementation of reasonable efforts to preserve or reunify the family inconsistent with the best interests of the child and with the permanency plan for the child.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 60, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 87, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 116, § 17, effective July 13, 2004; 2012, ch. 146, § 138, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 79, § 4, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 128, § 29, effective June 27, 2019.

610.130.
Appeal from disposition order.

Unless otherwise exempted, an appeal to the Circuit Court may be taken as a matter of right from the juvenile session of the District Court from dispositional orders under KRS

610.110

. The appeal shall be taken in the manner provided in the Rules of Criminal Procedure, and the Circuit Court shall, in the best interest of the child, hear such cases expeditiously.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 32, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 24, effective April 10, 1988.

610.140.
Appeals in dependency cases. [Repealed.]

610.150.
Authority of Circuit Court.

Upon the entry of a dispositional order and an appeal being filed, all issues relating to detention, custody, or participation in court-ordered programs may be reviewed by the Circuit Court upon motion being filed by the child with notice to the county and Commonwealth’s attorney.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 34, effective July 1, 1987.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.27.

610.160.
Court-ordered participation in child’s treatment.

Upon recommendation of the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet or upon its own initiative, the court may order any parent, guardian, or person exercising similar custodial control or supervision of a child referred to the court to cooperate and actively participate in such treatment or social service programs which might reasonably be expected to meet the goal of enhancing the best interests of the child and family unity. When it appears to the court that the parents have failed to cooperate and actively participate in said programs, the court may issue a summons for the parents of the child which shall require them to attend a hearing in which they may rebut any evidence which may allege that they have violated a court order. The court may exercise its powers of contempt in addition to any other remedy provided by law to compel obedience of the parents, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child to the court’s orders.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 35, effective July 1, 1987; 1996, ch. 358, § 27, effective July 15, 1997.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). Under 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 358, sec. 67(1), the amendment of this statute by Section 27 of that Act becomes effective July 15, 1997.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A married child under the age of 16 has a legal responsibility to attend school, but once a child marries, the parent or guardian no longer has a legal obligation to ensure that the child attends school; however, if the spouse of a minor who is under the age of 16 and who is an habitual truant, is found to be a person exercising custodial control or supervision as defined in subdivision (26) of KRS

600.020

, the spouse may be subject to penalties under the Juvenile Code.

OAG 87-40

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Family Court: Proceedings for Dependency, Neglect and Abuse: The Role of the Family Court Judge and the Guardian ad Litem, Vol. 68, No. 6, Nov. 2004, Ky. Bench & Bar 21.

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, §§ 32.23, 32.24, 32.31.

610.170.
Court-ordered child support.

If it appears from the investigation required in KRS

610.100

or otherwise that the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of any child, or the estate of any child, who has been found to fall within the purview of KRS Chapters 600 to 645 and who has been left in his own home or in the home of a relative, placed on probation or placed in a foster home or boarding home, or in the care of a public or private facility or agency, or the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, is able to contribute to the support of the child, the court shall enter an order requiring the parent or estate to pay a reasonable sum for the support, maintenance, or education of the child. The order shall direct that the money be paid to the circuit clerk to be disbursed as ordered by the court or be paid to the person, facility, agency, or the Department of Juvenile Justice or cabinet to which the child was committed or probated. On application and on such notice as the court may direct, the court may make alterations in the requirement for contribution. The court may issue such orders necessary to compel payment of the sum due. The enforcement of a sentence imposed on a parent who fails to comply with the order of the court may be suspended at the discretion of the court, but the suspension may be revoked at the discretion of the court upon the failure of the parent to obey further orders of the court. This section shall not apply when the parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child was the victim of the child’s criminal conduct under KRS Chapters 635 or 640, or filed the complaint against the child under other provisions of the Unified Juvenile Code.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 36, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 25, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 28, effective July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 443, § 17, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 534, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

610.180.
Financial penalty when child found delinquent.

A parent or other person exercising custodial control or supervision of a child is charged with the control of such child and shall have the power to exercise parental control and authority over such child. In any case where a child is adjudicated a public offender and placed on probation, if the court finds at the hearing that the person having custody of such child has failed or neglected to subject him to reasonable parental control and authority, and that such failure or neglect is the proximate cause of the act or acts of the child upon which the adjudication is based, the court may require such parent to enter into a recognizance with sufficient surety, in an amount of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the conditions of probation of such child. If the child thereafter commits a second act and is by reason thereof adjudicated a public offender, or violates the conditions of probation, and the court finds at the hearing that the failure or neglect of such parent to subject him to reasonable parental control and authority or to faithfully discharge the conditions of probation of such child on the part of such parent, is the proximate cause of the act of the child upon which such second finding is based, or upon which such child is found to have violated the conditions of his probation, the court may declare all or a part of the recognizance forfeited and the amount of such forfeited recognizance shall be applied in payment of any damages which may have been caused by such child, if there be such damages, otherwise, the proceeds therefrom, or part remaining after the payment of damages as aforesaid, shall be retained by the court to apply to any future damages resulting from the act or acts of said child before he reaches his eighteenth birthday, at which date the remaining proceeds shall be returned to the parent or guardian. The provisions of this section as it relates to failure or neglect of parents to subject a child to reasonable parental control and authority shall be in addition to and not in substitution for any other sections of KRS Chapters 600 to 645 relating to failure or neglect to exercise such parental control or authority. The provisions of this section shall not apply to foster parents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 37, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 26, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, §§ 32.24, 32.31.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Minors, § 30.16.

610.190.
Arrest laws applicable to child taken into custody — Applicability of bail laws — Custody by person other than peace officer.

The law relating to the persons by whom and the circumstances under which a person may be arrested for a public offense shall be applicable to children, but the taking of a child into custody under such law shall not be termed an arrest until the court has made the decision to try the child in Circuit or District Court as an adult. The law relating to bail shall not be applicable to children detained in accordance with this chapter unless the child is subject to being tried in Circuit or District Court as an adult.

A peace officer may take a child into protective custody if the officer suspects the child to be a runaway. A child taken into protective custody under this subsection shall not be considered to have been arrested and may be held at the locations specified in KRS 610.220(1), after which the officer shall proceed with an initial investigation as provided for in KRS

610.200

.

When a child is taken into custody by a person other than a peace officer, such person shall as soon as possible place the child in the custody of a peace officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 38, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 27, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 29, effective July 15, 1997; 2014, ch. 132, § 40, effective July 1, 2015.

610.200.
Duties of peace officer.

When a peace officer has taken or received a child into custody on a charge of committing an offense, the officer shall immediately inform the child of his constitutional rights and afford him the protections required thereunder, notify the parent, or if the child is committed, the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as appropriate, and if the parent is not available, then a relative, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, that the child has been taken into custody, give an account of specific charges against the child, including the specific statute alleged to have been violated, and the reasons for taking the child into custody.

When a peace officer has taken or received a child into protective custody on suspicion of being a runaway, the officer shall immediately notify:

The child’s parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, if determined;

The cabinet or Department of Juvenile Justice, if appropriate; and

The court-designated worker.

If the parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or supervision is identified and notified, the peace officer may retain custody of the child for a reasonable period to allow the person notified the opportunity to arrive at the officer’s location and collect the child.

If the parent, guardian, or other person exercising custodial control or supervision cannot be identified or located, the peace officer may retain custody of the child for a period of time not to exceed two (2) hours to continue his or her investigation.

If, at the conclusion of the peace officer’s investigation, the parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child is identified and notified, the peace officer shall return the child to the custody of that person and shall file a status offense case with the court-designated worker.

If, at the conclusion of the peace officer’s investigation, the parent, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child cannot be identified or located, or that person refuses to collect the child, the peace officer shall file a complaint pursuant to KRS

610.012

.

Unless the child is subject to trial as an adult or unless the nature of the offense or other circumstances are such as to indicate the necessity of retaining the child in custody, the officer shall release the child to the custody of his parent or if the child is committed, the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as appropriate; or if the parent is not available, then a relative, guardian, or person exercising custodial control or supervision or other responsible person or agency approved by the court upon the written promise, signed by such person or agency, to bring the child to the court at a stated time or at such time as the court may order. The written promise, accompanied by a written report by the officer, shall be submitted forthwith to the court or court-designated worker and shall detail the reasons for having taken custody of the child, the release of the child, the person to whom the child was released, and the reasons for the release.

If the person fails to produce the child as agreed or upon notice from the Court as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a summons, warrant, or custody order may be issued for the apprehension of the person or of the child, or both.

If the person notified to collect a suspected runaway pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section fails or refuses to collect the child, the peace officer shall notify the county attorney, who may file a charge of endangering the welfare of a minor, and the cabinet.

The release of a child pursuant to this section shall not preclude a peace officer from proceeding with a complaint against a child or any other person.

Unless the child is subject to trial as an adult, if the child is not released, the peace officer shall contact the court-designated worker who may:

Release the child to his parents;

Release the child to such other persons or organizations as are authorized by law;

Release the child to either of the above subject to stated conditions; or

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, authorize the peace officer to retain custody of the child for an additional period not to exceed twelve (12) hours during which the peace officer may transport the child to a secure juvenile detention facility or a nonsecure facility. If the child is retained in custody, the court-designated worker shall give notice to the child’s parents or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the fact that the child is being retained in custody.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, no child ten (10) years of age or under shall be taken to or placed in a juvenile detention facility.

Any child ten (10) years of age or under who has been charged with the commission of a capital offense or with an offense designated as a Class A or Class B felony may be taken to or placed in a secure juvenile detention facility or youth alternative center when there is no available less restrictive alternative.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 39, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 28, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 30, effective July 15, 1997; 1998, ch. 443, § 18, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 263, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 132, § 41, effective July 1, 2015.

610.210.
Peace officer may take child to court-approved custody center. [Repealed.]

610.220.
Permitted purposes for holding child in custody — Time limitation — Extension — Separation from adult prisoners — Prohibition against attaching child to stationary object.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, if an officer takes or receives a child into custody on an allegation of committing a public offense or into protective custody on being a suspected runaway, the child may be held at a police station, secure juvenile detention facility, youth alternative center, a nonsecure facility, or, as necessary, in a hospital or clinic for the following purposes:

Identification and booking;

Attempting to notify the parents or person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, a relative, guardian, other responsible person, or the cabinet;

Photographing;

Fingerprinting;

Physical examinations, including examinations for evidence;

Evidence collection, including scientific tests;

Records checks;

Determining whether the child is subject to trial as an adult; and

Other inquiries of a preliminary nature.

A child may be held in custody pursuant to this section for a period of time not to exceed two (2) hours, unless an extension of time is granted. Permission for an extension of time may be granted by the court, trial commissioner, or court-designated worker pursuant to KRS

610.200

(6) (d) and the child may be retained in custody for up to an additional ten (10) hours at a facility of the type listed in subsection (1) of this section except for an intermittent holding facility for the period of retention.

Any child held in custody pursuant to this section shall be sight and sound separated from any adult prisoners held in secure custody at the same location, and shall not be handcuffed to or otherwise securely attached to any stationary object.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 41, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 29, effective April 10, 1988; 1996, ch. 358, § 31, effective July 15, 1997; 2000, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 534, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 160, § 2, effective April 21, 2004; 2014, ch. 132, § 42, effective July 1, 2015.

610.230.
Detaining children in jails. [Repealed.]

610.240.
Detention longer than specified time. [Repealed.]

610.250.
Conditional releases. [Repealed.]

610.255.
Peace officer may take child to court-approved center — Release of child without formal charges filed.

The peace officer may divert the child from the formal court process and take the child to a court-approved center offering voluntary services to children and release the child without formal charges being filed, if:

The offense the child has allegedly committed under the provisions of KRS 610.010(1) is not a felony offense;

The peace officer has received the permission of the parent or other responsible adult; and

The peace officer has followed guidelines which the court has established for such release.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 31, effective April 10, 1988; 2008, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 15, 2008.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.20.

610.260.
Court options when detention exceeds specified time limits. [Repealed.]

610.265.
Detention of children in specified facilities — Time frame for holding detention hearing — Release of child required if hearing not held as specified.

Any child who is alleged to be a status offender or who is accused of being in contempt of court on an underlying finding that the child is a status offender may be detained in a nonsecure facility or a secure juvenile detention facility for a period of time not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending a detention hearing. Any child who is accused of committing a public offense or of being in contempt of court on an underlying public offense may be detained in a secure juvenile detention facility or a nonsecure setting approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice for a period of time not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending a detention hearing.

Within the period of detention described in subsection (1) of this section, exclusive of weekends and holidays, a detention hearing shall be held by the judge or trial commissioner of the court for the purpose of determining whether the child shall be further detained. At the hearing held pursuant to this subsection, the court shall consider the nature of the offense, the child’s background and history, and other information relevant to the child’s conduct or condition.

If the court orders a child detained further, that detention shall be served as follows:

If the child is charged with a capital offense, Class A felony, or Class B felony, detention shall occur in a secure juvenile detention facility pending the child’s next court appearance subject to the court’s review of the detention order prior to that court appearance;

Except as provided in KRS 630.080(2), if it is alleged that the child is a status offender, the child may be detained in a secure juvenile detention facility for a period not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours after which detention shall occur in a nonsecure setting approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice pending the child’s next court appearance subject to the court’s review of the detention order prior to the next court appearance;

If a status offender or a child alleged to be a status offender is charged with violating a valid court order, the child may be detained in a secure juvenile detention facility, or in a nonsecure setting approved by the Department of Juvenile Justice, for a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending the child’s next court appearance;

Prior to ordering a status offender or alleged status offender who is subject to a valid court order securely detained because the child violated the valid court order, the court shall:

Affirm that the requirements for a valid court order were met at the time the original order was issued;

Make a determination during the adjudicatory hearing that the child violated the valid court order; and

Within forty-eight (48) hours after the adjudicatory hearing on the violation of a valid court order by the child, exclusive of weekends and holidays, receive and review a written report prepared by an appropriate public agency that reviews the behavior of the child and the circumstances under which the child was brought before the court, determines the reasons for the child’s behavior, and determines whether all dispositions other than secure detention have been exhausted or are inappropriate. If a prior written report is included in the child’s file, that report shall not be used to satisfy this requirement. The child may be securely detained for a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, pending receipt and review of the report by the court. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS

610.060

. The findings required by this subsection shall be included in any order issued by the court which results in the secure or nonsecure detention of a status offender; and

If the child is charged with a public offense, or contempt on a public offense, and the county in which the case is before the court is served by a state operated secure detention facility under the statewide detention plan, the child shall be referred to the Department of Juvenile Justice for a security assessment and placement in an approved detention facility or program pending the child’s next court appearance.

If, at the hearing conducted under subsection (2) of this section, the court conducts an adjudicatory hearing on the merits of a violation of a valid court order, that hearing shall conform to the requirements of KRS

630.080

.

If the detention hearing is not held as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the child shall be released as provided in KRS

610.290

.

If the child is not released, the court-designated worker shall notify the parent, person exercising custodial control or supervision, a relative, guardian, or other responsible adult, and the Department of Juvenile Justice or the cabinet, as appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 32, effective April 10, 1988; 1998, ch. 606, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 193, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 160, § 3, effective April 21, 2004; 2008, ch. 87, § 5, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 132, § 43, effective July 1, 2015.

610.266.
Restriction on placement of nonoffender or curfew violator.

The following persons shall not be detained in a secure juvenile detention facility:

A nonoffender; or

Any child charged with a violation of a statute or local ordinance pertaining to curfew.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 87, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2014, ch. 132, § 44, effective July 1, 2015.

610.267.
Youth alternative centers. [Repealed.]

610.270.
Failure to release to parent or other adult. [Repealed.]

610.280.
Considerations for and findings from detention hearing.

At the detention hearing held pursuant to KRS

610.265

, the court shall make separate findings as follows:

If there is probable cause to believe that an offense has been committed and that the accused child committed that offense. Probable cause may be established in the same manner as in a preliminary hearing in cases involving adults accused of felonies. The child shall be afforded the right to confront and cross-examine witnesses. The Commonwealth shall bear the burden of proof, and if it should fail to establish probable cause, the child shall be released and the complaint or petition dismissed unless the court determines further detention is necessary to assure the appearance of the child in court on another pending case;

In determining whether a child should be further detained, the court shall consider the seriousness of the alleged offense, the possibility that the child would commit an offense dangerous to himself or the community pending disposition of the alleged offense, the child’s prior record, if any, and whether there are other charges pending against the child.

If, after completion of the detention hearing, the court is of the opinion that detention is necessary, the order shall state on the record the specific reasons for detention.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 47, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 33, effective April 10, 1988; 1994, ch. 489, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 606, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 193, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 257, § 14, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.20.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Juvenile Court, Form 5.5.

610.290.
Rights of juvenile.

Unless a hearing is held within the time frame established by KRS

610.265

, and the necessity for detention properly established, the child shall be released to the custody of his parents, person exercising custodial control or supervision or other responsible adult pending further disposition of the case.

The child shall have a right to counsel at his detention hearing determining his right to freedom pending the disposition of his case, and his parents, person exercising custodial control or supervision or other responsible adult shall have a right to attend the hearing if such attendance will not unnecessarily delay the hearing. Any person aggrieved by a proceeding under this subsection may proceed by habeas corpus to the Circuit Court.

Whether the child is released before or after a hearing, or is detained as a result of such hearing, the child and his parents, person exercising custodial control or supervision or other responsible adult shall be given written notice of the time and place of the adjudicatory hearing concerning the child and an account of the specific charges against the child, including the specific statute alleged to have been violated. Such notice shall be given at least seventy-two (72) hours prior to the initial hearing on the case.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 48, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 34, effective April 10, 1988; 2000, ch. 193, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 160, § 4, effective April 21, 2004.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, §§ 32.5, 32.20.